test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kupshaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kupšā: # Noun 51 'eng /est ülesostja/fin' - full paradigm
     kupšā+N+Sg+Nom: kupšā
     kupšā+N+Sg+Gen: kupšā
     kupšā+N+Sg+Par: kupšõ
     kupšā+N+Sg+Dat: kupšān
     kupšā+N+Sg+Ins: kupšāks
     kupšā+N+Sg+Ill: kupšõ
     kupšā+N+Sg+Ela: kupšāst
     kupšā+N+Pl+Nom: kupšād
     kupšā+N+Pl+Gen: kupšād
     kupšā+N+Pl+Par: kupšīdi
     kupšā+N+Pl+Dat: kupšādõn
     kupšā+N+Pl+Ins: kupšādõks
     kupšā+N+Pl+Ill: kupšīz
     kupšā+N+Pl+Ela: kupšīst
